Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1531
Services and support; eligibility.

In order to be eligible for services and support under section 68-1530:

(1) The child shall reside in the State of Nebraska;

(2) The income and assets of the child shall not exceed the maximum established under subsection (4) of section 68-1530;

(3) The child shall have a medically determinable physical or mental impairment or combination of impairments that (a) causes marked and severe functional limitations and (b) can be expected to cause death or has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve months; and

(4) The child shall be determined to meet the intermediate care facility institutional level of care criteria as set forth in subsection (4) of section 68-1530.

Laws 2022, LB376, § 3.